Alabama, session 2026rs, HB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"invisible disability" means a physical or mental condition
that may interfere with an individual's ability to communicate
with a first responder, including:
(1) A communication impediment;
Page 1

(1) A communication impediment;
HB101 INTRODUCED
(2) Hearing loss;
(3) Blindness or a visual impairment;
(4) Autism spectrum disorder;
(5) Traumatic brain injury;
(6) Schizophrenia;
(7) Alzheimer's disease or dementia;
(8) Post traumatic stress disorder;
(9) Epilepsy;
(10) A developmental disability;
(11) Down syndrome;
(12) Diabetes;
(13) A heart condition; or
(14) A cognitive disability.
(b) Notwithstanding Sections 32-6-64, 32-6-65, 32-6-67,
and 32-6-68, Code of Alabama 1975, an owner of a motor vehicle
who is a resident of Alabama and who has been diagnosed with
an invisible disability or an individual who is the primary
caretaker of an individual who has been diagnosed with an
invisible disability shall be issued a distinctive "Invisible
Disability" license plate upon:
(1) Application to the judge of probate, license
commissioner, or other issuing official;
(2) Compliance with motor vehicle registration and
licensing laws;
(3) Payment of regular fees required by law for license
plates for private passenger or pleasure motor vehicles; and
(4) Payment of an additional annual fee of forty
dollars ($40).
Page 2

dollars ($40).
HB101 INTRODUCED
(c) To receive an "Invisible Disability" license plate,
the individual shall provide proof of the diagnosis from a
physician licensed to practice medicine in this state.
(d) The "Invisible Disability" license plates shall be
valid for five years and may then be replaced with either
conventional, personalized, or new "Invisible Disability"
license plates.
(e) Payment of required license fees and taxes for the
years during which a new plate is not issued shall be
evidenced as provided in Section 32-6-63, Code of Alabama
1975.
(f) Kulturecity, Incorporated shall be responsible for
the design of the distinctive license plate subject to
approval by the Commissioner of Revenue and compliance with
all laws and rules.
(g) Proceeds from the additional revenues generated by
the forty dollars ($40) minus the production and
administrative costs for the "Invisible Disability" license
plates shall be submitted monthly by the Department of Revenue
or other appropriate official to Kulturecity, Incorporated.
The proceeds shall be used to assist in accomplishing its goal
of creating sensory accessibility and inclusion for
individuals with invisible disabilities within the state.
(h) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3